Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-322] American Sign Language.
For purposes of this chapter, American Sign Language shall be recognized as a
world language, and any public school may offer a course in American Sign
Language. A student who successfully completes a course in American Sign
Language shall be entitled to receive credit for that course toward
satisfaction of a world language requirement of the public school at which the
course is offered. [L 2016, c 152, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next